Missouri, session 2026, SB1771.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 233, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
two new sections, to be known as sections 233.298 and 233.299,
to read as follows:
233.298. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Governing authority", the commission, council, or
other body which directs the affairs of a special road
district;
(2) "Inactive", a special road district that is
characterized by any of the following criteria:
(a) Has not carried out any of the special purposes or
functions for which it was formed within the preceding
consecutive five-year period;
(b) No election has been held for the purpose of
electing a member of the governing body within the preceding
consecutive seven-year period or, in those instances where
members of the governing body are appointed and not elected,
where no member of the governing body has been appointed
within the preceding seven-year period; or
(c) The special road district has been determined to
be unauditable by the state auditor;

SB 1771 2
(3) "Unauditable", a special road district that the
state auditor has determined to be incapable of being
audited because the special road district has improperly
maintained, failed to maintain, or failed to submit adequate
accounts, records, files, or reports for an audit to be
completed.
2. As an alternative to dissolution of a special road
district provided in sections 233.290 and 233.295, a
petition for an order of dissolution signed by the majority
of the board of commissioners or other governing authority
of such district shall be presented to the circuit court of
the county in which the board of commissioners is situated.
3. Upon the filing of such petition for an order of
dissolution, the circuit court shall enter an order setting
the same for hearing at a date not less than thirty days
from the date of filing, and the petitioner shall give
notice of such hearing by publication in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county in which the special road
district is located once a week for three successive weeks,
and by posting in three public places in the county in which
the special road district is located at least twenty-one
days before said hearing. At least one notice shall be
posted in the district. The notices shall set forth the
filing of the petition, its purpose, and the date and place
of the hearing thereon.
4. After said hearing, the court shall enter its order
dissolving or refusing to dissolve said special road
district. A finding that the best interests of all persons
concerned will be served by the proposed dissolution shall
be essential to an order of dissolution. If the court finds
that such special road district is solvent, the court shall
order the sale of such assets, other than cash, by the

SB 1771 3
sheriff of the county in which the board is situated, in the
manner provided by law for the sale of property on execution.
5. The proceeds of the sale, together with moneys on
hand in the treasury of the district, shall, after payment
of all costs and expenses, be paid to the treasurer of the
same county and placed to the credit of the school district,
or districts, in which such district is located.
6. Upon a finding of insolvency, the court shall then
determine the indebtedness of the special road district, the
creditors thereof, and their claims. The court shall then
set a date and a place for a second hearing, which hearing
shall be not less than sixty days nor more than one hundred
twenty days from the hearing as provided in subsection 3 of
this section.
7. The clerk shall give notice of the second hearing
by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the
county in which the special road district is located once a
week for three successive weeks, and by posting in three
public places in the county in which the special road
district is located at least twenty-one days before the
hearing, and shall give such other notice to creditors and
other interested parties as the court may deem necessary or
advisable. At least one notice shall be posted in the
district. The notices shall set forth the filing of the
petition, its purpose, the finding of the court on the
petition, the date and place of the second hearing, and the
purpose of the hearing as stated in subsection 6 of this
section.
8. At the second hearing, the court shall have
authority to order the sale of any special road district
property. If the proceeds of such sale together with any
case remaining on hand to the credit of the district are

SB 1771 4
insufficient to retire such indebtedness together with all
costs and expenses, the court shall have authority to order
the board of commissioners to levy assessments in the manner
provided by law against the property in the district in
amounts sufficient to retire said indebted and pay the costs
and expenses. At such hearing, any property owner within
the district may appear and be heard for or against such
levy.
9. After the indebtedness of the special road district
has been settled or paid, the court shall determine whether
the best interests of all persons concerned will be served
by the proposed dissolution and shall make a finding
thereon. The court shall then enter its order dissolving or
refusing to dissolve said special road district.
10. In all proceedings brought under this section, the
court shall make provision for the costs and expenses of
proceedings hereunder and for the payment of the same.
233.299. 1. Special road districts which are located
in any county with more than one hundred thousand but fewer
than one hundred twenty thousand inhabitants and with a
county seat with more than nine thousand but fewer than
eleven thousand inhabitants may be disincorporated when the
district has not actively carried out any of the special
purposes or functions for which it was formed within the
preceding consecutive five-year period.
2. Upon the filing with the county commission of each
county in which the special road district is located of a
resolution of any governmental unit calling for the
disincorporation of a special district, or upon the filing
with the county commission of each county in which the
special road district is located of the petition of twenty
percent of the voters within the special road district

SB 1771 5
calling for the disincorporation of the special road
district, the county commission shall hold public hearings
to determine whether or not any services have been provided
within a consecutive five-year period and whether the best
interests of all persons concerned will be served by the
proposed dissolution of the special road district.
3. If the county commission finds that no services
have been provided within the preceding consecutive five-
year period and that the best interests of all persons
concerned will be served by disincorporating the special
road district, it shall order that such action be taken,
specify the manner in which it is to be accomplished and
supervise the liquidation of any assets and the satisfaction
of any outstanding indebtedness.
4. If a special road district is disincorporated, the
proceeds of the sale of any of its assets, together with
money on hand in the treasury of the special road district,
shall after payment of all costs and expenses and all
outstanding indebtedness be paid to the county treasurer to
be placed to the credit of the school district, or
districts, in which such special road district is situated.
5. If a special road district is disincorporated and
the proceeds of the sale of any of its assets, together with
money on hand in the treasury of the special road district,
are insufficient to retire any outstanding indebtedness,
together with all costs and expenses of liquidation, the
county commission shall levy assessments in the manner
provided by law against the property in the special road
district in amounts sufficient to retire the indebtedness
and pay the costs and expenses.
✓